Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.22 RCW to read as follows:No podiatric physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the board or department for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 18.32 RCW to read as follows:No dentist licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the commission or department of health for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 18.57 RCW to read as follows:No osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the board or department for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:No pharmacist licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the commission or department for dispensing prescription opioid drugs, after confirming that a prescription is valid, if the prescription opioid drugs were prescribed for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who has presented such a prescription and has been provided with consultation.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. A new section is added to chapter 18.71 RCW to read as follows:No physician licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the commission or department of health for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 18.71A RCW to read as follows:No physician assistant licensed under this chapter acting in good faith may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the commission or department for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 18.79 RCW to read as follows:No advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under this chapter may be subject to criminal or civil liability, or disciplinary action by the commission or department for prescribing opioid drugs for legitimate medical purposes in the course of professional practice to a patient with chronic pain who in consultation with their practitioner has deemed an opioid prescription medically appropriate and has signed a written informed consent that is documented in the patient's medical records.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. This act may be known and cited as the good faith pain act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---